Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2144
Certified art therapist; confidentiality.

Except as otherwise provided in section 38-2136, a certified art therapist shall not disclose any information, including, but not limited to, client records, artwork, verbal or artistic expressions, assessment results, or assessment interpretations, that such certified art therapist may have acquired from any person consulting such certified art therapist in a professional capacity.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 20.